Maryland, session 2026, HB0150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
Article IV – Judiciary Department
[3.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0150*

HOUSE BILL 150
Except for the Judges of the District Court, the Judges of the several Courts other
than the Supreme Court of Maryland or any intermediate courts of appeal shall, subject to
the provisions of Section 5 of this Article of the Constitution, be elected in Baltimore City
and in each county, by the qualified voters of the city and of each county, respectively, all
of the said Judges to be elected at the general election to be held on the Tuesday after the
first Monday in November, as now provided for in the Constitution. Each of the said Judges
shall hold the office for the term of fifteen years from the time of the election, and until the
Judge’s successor is elected and qualified, or until the Judge shall have attained the age of
seventy years, whichever may first happen, and be reeligible thereto until the Judge shall
have attained the age of seventy years, and not after. In case of the inability of any of said
Judges to discharge the Judge’s duties with efficiency, by reason of continued sickness, or
of physical or mental infirmity, it shall be in the power of the General Assembly, two–thirds
of the members of each House concurring, with the approval of the Governor to retire said
Judge from office.]
3A.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, any former
judge, except a former judge of the Orphans’ Court, may be assigned by the Chief Justice
of the Supreme Court of Maryland, upon approval of a majority of the court, to sit
temporarily in any court of this State, except an Orphans’ Court, as provided by law.
(2) (i) A retired judge of the Circuit Court for Montgomery County that
sits as the Orphans’ Court for Montgomery County may be assigned by the Chief Justice of
the Supreme Court of Maryland, upon approval of a majority of the Supreme Court of
Maryland, to do an act that a judge of the Orphans’ Court for Montgomery County is
authorized to perform.
(ii) A retired judge of the Circuit Court for Harford County that sits
as the Orphans’ Court for Harford County may be assigned by the Chief Justice of the
Supreme Court of Maryland, upon approval of a majority of the Supreme Court of
Maryland, to do an act that a judge of the Orphans’ Court for Harford County is authorized
to perform.
(b) The provisions of this section apply, notwithstanding provisions appearing
elsewhere in this Article pertaining to retirement of judges [upon] attaining THE age OF
70 YEARS.
[5.
Upon every occurrence or recurrence of a vacancy through death, resignation,
removal, disqualification by reason of age or otherwise, or expiration of the term of fifteen
years of any judge of a circuit court, or creation of the office of any such judge, or in any
other way, the Governor shall appoint a person duly qualified to fill said office, who shall
hold the same until the election and qualification of his successor. His successor shall be
elected at the first biennial general election for Representatives in Congress after the
expiration of the term of fifteen years (if the vacancy occurred in that way) or the first such

HOUSE BILL 150 3
general election after one year after the occurrence of the vacancy in any other way than
through expiration of such term. Except in case of reappointment of a judge upon expiration
of his term of fifteen years, no person shall be appointed who will become disqualified by
reason of age and thereby unable to continue to hold office until the prescribed time when
his successor would have been elected.]
5A.
(a) A vacancy in the office of a justice or judge OF A CIRCUIT COURT OR of an
appellate court, whether occasioned by the death, resignation, removal, retirement,
disqualification by reason of age, or rejection by the voters of an incumbent, the creation of
the office of a justice or judge, or otherwise, shall be filled as provided in this section.
(b) [Upon] ON the occurrence of a vacancy the Governor shall appoint, by and
with the advice and consent of the Senate, a person duly qualified to fill [said office] THE
VACANCY who shall hold the [same] OFFICE until the election for continuance in office as
provided in subsections (c) [and], (d), AND (E) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) The continuance in office of a justice of the Supreme Court of Maryland,
FOLLOWING AN APPOINTMENT TO FILL A VACANCY, is subject to approval or rejection
by the registered voters of the appellate judicial circuit from which the justice was
appointed at the next general election following the expiration of [one] 1 year from the date
of the occurrence of the vacancy which the justice was appointed to fill, and at the general
election next occurring every [ten] 10 years thereafter.
(d) The continuance in office of a judge of [the Appellate Court of Maryland] ANY
INTERMEDIATE COURTS OF APPEAL, FOLLOWING AN APPOINTMENT TO FILL A
VACANCY, is subject to approval or rejection by the registered voters of the geographical
area prescribed by law at the next general election following the expiration of [one] 1 year
from the date of the occurrence of the vacancy which the judge was appointed to fill, and at
the general election next occurring every [ten] 10 years thereafter.
(E) THE CONTINUANCE IN OFFICE OF A JUDGE OF A CIRCUIT COURT,
FOLLOWING AN APPOINTMENT TO FILL A VACANCY, IS SUBJECT TO APPROVAL OR
REJECTION BY THE REGISTERED VOTERS OF THE CITY OR COUNTY FROM WHICH THE
JUDGE WAS APPOINTED AT THE NEXT GENERAL ELECTION FOLLOWING THE
EXPIRATION OF 1 YEAR FROM THE DATE OF THE OCCURRENCE OF THE VACANCY
WHICH THE JUDGE WAS APPOINTED TO FILL, AND AT THE GENERAL ELECTION NEXT
OCCURRING EVERY 10 YEARS THEREAFTER.
[(e)] (F) The approval or rejection by the registered voters of a justice or judge
as provided for in subsections (c) [and], (d), AND (E) OF THIS SECTION shall be a vote for
the justice’s or judge’s retention in office for a term of [ten] 10 years or the justice’s or
judge’s removal. The justice’s or judge’s name shall be on the appropriate ballot, without
opposition, and the voters shall vote yes or no for the justice’s or judge’s retention in office.

HOUSE BILL 150
If the voters reject the retention in office of a justice or judge, or if the vote is tied, the office
becomes vacant [ten] 10 days after certification of the election returns.
[(f)] (G) An appellate court OR A CIRCUIT COURT justice or judge shall retire
when the justice or judge attains [the justice’s or judge’s seventieth birthday] THE AGE OF
70 YEARS.
[(g)] (H) A member of the General Assembly who is otherwise qualified for
appointment to judicial office is not disqualified by reason of the member’s membership in
a General Assembly which proposed or enacted any constitutional amendment or statute
affecting the method of selection, continuance in office, or retirement or removal of a justice
or judge, the creation or abolition of a court, an increase or decrease in the number of
justices or judges of any court, or an increase or decrease in the salary, pension or other
allowances of any justice or judge.
11.
The election for Judges, hereinbefore provided, and all elections for Clerks, Registers
of Wills, and other officers, provided in this Constitution, except State’s Attorneys, shall be
certified, and the returns made, by the Clerks of the Circuit Courts of the Counties, and
the Clerk of the Superior Court of Baltimore City, respectively, to the Governor, who shall
issue commissions to the different persons for the offices to which they shall have been,
respectively, elected; and in all such elections for officers other than JUSTICES AND judges
of an appellate court OR A CIRCUIT COURT, the person having the greatest number of
votes, shall be declared to be elected.
Article XVIII – Provisions of Limited Duration
6.
(A) (1) FOR THE PURPOSE OF IMPLEMENTING THE AMENDMENTS TO
ARTICLE IV OF THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION PROPOSED BY CHAPTER ___ (H. B.
___) (6LR0967) OF THE ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF 2026 CONCERNING
THE SELECTION AND TENURE OF CIRCUIT COURT JUDGES, THE FOLLOWING
PROVISIONS SHALL GOVERN.
(2) IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE XIV, SECTION 1A OF THIS
CONSTITUTION, THIS SECTION SHALL EXPIRE WHEN ALL OF THE JUDGES OF THE
CIRCUIT COURTS HAVE COMPLETED ALL THE TERMS FOR WHICH THE JUDGES ARE
RETAINED IN OFFICE UNDER SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) OF THIS SECTION OR HAVE
VACATED THEIR OFFICES FOR ANY REASON.
(B) (1) EACH JUDGE OF A CIRCUIT COURT WHO IS IN OFFICE FOR AN
ELECTED TERM ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THESE AMENDMENTS, UNLESS THE
JUDGE DIES, RESIGNS, RETIRES, OR IS OTHERWISE LAWFULLY REMOVED, SHALL

HOUSE BILL 150 5
CONTINUE IN OFFICE UNTIL THE NEXT GENERAL ELECTION AFTER THE END OF THE
JUDGE’S ELECTED TERM OR UNTIL THE JUDGE ATTAINS THE AGE OF 70 YEARS,
WHICHEVER OCCURS FIRST.
(2) (I) FOLLOWING THE PERIOD DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, CONTINUANCE IN OFFICE OF A JUDGE OF A CIRCUIT COURT IS
THEN SUBJECT TO ARTICLE IV, SECTION 5A OF THIS CONSTITUTION.
(II) IN NO EVENT SHALL ANY JUDGE OF THE CIRCUIT COURT
CONTINUE IN OFFICE AFTER ATTAINING THE AGE OF 70 YEARS.
(C) (1) EACH JUDGE OF A CIRCUIT COURT WHO IS IN OFFICE ON THE
EFFECTIVE DATE OF THESE AMENDMENTS, BUT WHO HAS NOT BEEN ELECTED TO BE
IN THAT OFFICE BY THE VOTERS, SHALL, WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE
DATE OF THESE AMENDMENTS, BE REAPPOINTED TO THAT OFFICE.
(2) (I) CONTINUANCE OF THE JUDGE OF A CIRCUIT COURT IN
OFFICE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS THEN SUBJECT TO ARTICLE
IV, SECTION 5A OF THIS CONSTITUTION.
(II) IN NO EVENT SHALL ANY JUDGE OF A CIRCUIT COURT
CONTINUE IN OFFICE AFTER ATTAINING THE AGE OF 70 YEARS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the amendment to the
Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this Act shall be submitted to the qualified
voters of the State at the next general election to be held in November 2026 for adoption or
rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution. At that general
election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be by ballot, and on
each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the Constitutional Amendment” and
“Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now provided by law. Immediately after the
election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of the vote for and against the proposed
amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution, and further
proceedings held in accordance with Article XIV.